Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 7
TAXES AND FEES

44-32-701. License fees and Colorado-bred horse race requirement.

Subject to section 44-32-702 (1), for the privilege of conducting racing under a license issued under and of operating an in-state simulcast facility pursuant to this article 32, a licensee for the racing of greyhounds and an operator of an in-state simulcast facility that receives simulcast races of greyhounds shall pay to the department through the division four and one-half percent of the gross receipts derived from pari-mutuel wagering during any such race meet or placed on the simulcast races that are received through a live greyhound track.

For the privilege of conducting racing under a license issued under and of operating an in-state simulcast facility pursuant to this article 32, a licensee for the racing of horses and an operator of an in-state simulcast facility that receives simulcast races of horses or greyhounds pursuant to section 44-32-602 (4)(a)(I) shall pay to the department through the division three-fourths of one percent of the gross receipts of the pari-mutuel wagering at any race meet or placed on the simulcast races; except that a licensee for the racing of horses at a class B track race meet shall pay to the department through the division three-fourths of one percent of the gross receipts of the pari-mutuel wagering at any such race meet.
(2) (a) (I) For the privilege of conducting racing under a license issued under and of operating an in-state simulcast facility pursuant to this article 32, a licensee for the racing of horses and an operator of an in-state simulcast facility that receives simulcast races of horses or greyhounds pursuant to section 44-32-602 (4)(a)(I) shall pay to the department through the division three-fourths of one percent of the gross receipts of the pari-mutuel wagering at any race meet or placed on the simulcast races; except that a licensee for the racing of horses at a class B track race meet shall pay to the department through the division three-fourths of one percent of the gross receipts of the pari-mutuel wagering at any such race meet.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2)(a)(II)(B) of this section, in addition to the amount paid to the department through the division in subsection (2)(a)(I) of this section, a licensee for the racing of horses and an operator of an in-state simulcast facility that receives simulcast races of horses or greyhounds pursuant to section 44-32-602 (4)(a)(I) shall pay to Colorado state university for allocation to its school of veterinary medicine one-fourth of one percent of the gross receipts of all pari-mutuel wagering, except on win, place, or show, at the horse race meet or placed on the simulcast races, to be used for racing-related equine research. To receive research funding under this subsection (2)(a)(II), an institution or individual must describe and report to the commission on all projects upon completion.

In the case of pari-mutuel wagers on greyhound simulcast signals received by a class B track, in lieu of the amounts otherwise payable to Colorado state university pursuant to subsection (2)(a)(II)(A) of this section, the licensee shall instead pay an equivalent amount into a trust account for distribution in accordance with rules of the commission under section 44-32-702 (1)(e)(I).

In addition to any money to be paid pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, a licensee for the racing of horses and an operator of an in-state simulcast facility that receives simulcast races of horses or greyhounds pursuant to section 44-32-602 (4)(a)(I) shall pay to a trust account one-half of one percent of the gross receipts of pari-mutuel wagering on win, place, and show and one and one-half percent of the gross receipts from all other pari-mutuel wagering at any such race meet or placed on the simulcast races for the horse breeders' and owners' awards and supplemental purse fund established in section 44-32-705.

The operator of a simulcast facility that receives simulcast races of horses or greyhounds pursuant to section 44-32-602 (4)(a)(I) shall retain five percent of the gross receipts of pari-mutuel wagering placed on the simulcast races at that facility, to be used to cover the particular expenses incurred in operating a simulcast facility.

Of the five percent of gross receipts retained pursuant to subsection (2)(c)(I) of this section, the operator of a simulcast facility that is not located at a class B track and that receives simulcast races of horses shall remit to the operator of the class B track from which the simulcast races were received one-fifth, representing one percent of the gross receipts of pari-mutuel wagering placed on the simulcast races at the simulcast facility.

For the purpose of encouraging the breeding, within the state, of race horses registered within their breeds, at least one race of each day's live horse race meet shall consist exclusively of Colorado-bred horses, if Colorado-bred horses are available. This requirement shall not apply to an in-state simulcast facility that is a horse track and that receives simulcast races of horses on any given race meet day but does not conduct a live horse race on such day.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 312, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-701 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-32-702. Unlawful to wager - exception - excess - taxes - special provisions for simulcast races - rules.

It is unlawful to conduct pool selling or bookmaking, or to circulate handbooks, or to bet or wager on any race meet licensed under the provisions of this article 32 other than by the pari-mutuel method.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, it is unlawful for a racing or simulcast facility licensee for the racing of greyhounds or horses to take more than the percentage of the gross receipts authorized by the commission pursuant to subsection (1)(b)(II) of this section of any pari-mutuel wagering on the races or simulcast races.

The commission may annually determine the authorized take-out under subsection (1)(b)(I) of this section by rule, but the take-out shall not exceed thirty percent of the gross receipts of any pari-mutuel wagering on races originating within Colorado.

Each licensee for the racing of horses shall pay as purses for the races in any horse race meet conducted at its in-state host track fifty percent of the breakage attributable thereto, and fifty percent of the track's commission. For purposes of this subsection (1)(c), "track's commission" means the maximum allowable percentage that may be taken, pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section, by a licensee for the racing of horses from the gross receipts from all pari-mutuel wagering placed on the races at the in-state host track, after deduction of the amounts specified in sections 44-32-701 (2)(a) and (2)(b) and 44-32-705 (2).

For each horse race meet it conducts, a licensee shall file with its license application with the commission an agreement between the licensee and the organization that represents the majority of the owners of horses participating at the race meet. The agreement shall specify the purse structure that shall apply to the races conducted at the horse race meet, including minimum purses per race and any conditions relating to overpayments or underpayments.

Each operator of an in-state simulcast facility that receives simulcast races of horses from either an in-state host track or an out-of-state host track, or of greyhounds from an out-of-state host track, shall pay to purse funds for the racing of horses and to the in-state or out-of-state tracks and simulcast facilities described in the simulcast agreement filed with the commission, the percentages of the gross pari-mutuel wagering on the simulcast races, after deduction of a signal fee required by an out-of-state host track or an in-state host track, paid during the current year or a previous year, and the applicable amounts specified in subsection (2)(b) of this section and in sections 44-32-701 (1) and (2) and 44-32-705 (2), as specified in the simulcast agreement. In the case of pari-mutuel wagers on greyhound simulcast signals received by a class B track from an out-of-state host track, the operator shall deposit the amounts payable pursuant to section 44-32-701 (2)(a)(II)(B) into a trust account for distribution, in accordance with rules of the commission, to greyhound welfare and adoption organizations.

To defray operating expenses, the operator of a simulcast facility located at a class B track may retain up to twenty percent of the net purses earned and payable to the horse purse fund as provided in subsection (1)(e)(I) of this section.

A licensee or operator shall retain horse purse funds, including funds established in section 44-32-705, payable by the licensee or operator under this section in a trust account in a commercial bank located in Colorado until the purse funds are paid to the horse owners or to the host track for payment to the horse owners; except that:

The money deposited in any such trust account shall be invested in a fund that invests in obligations of the United States government with maturities of less than one year or that is an account insured in full by an agency of the federal government; and

Money credited to a horse purse trust account from the source market fee in accordance with section 44-32-202 (3)(h)(II) shall be paid as authorized by the director as purses for races held at live race meets in Colorado or as otherwise authorized by rules of the commission.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section:

It is unlawful for any licensee to compute breaks in the pari-mutuel system in excess of ten cents; and

If, during any race meet conducted under this article 32, there are underpayments of the amount actually due to the wagerers, the amount of the excess of the underpayments over and above overpayments to wagerers, at the expiration of thirty days from the end of the meet, shall revert and belong to the state of Colorado and be paid to the department through the division and become a part of its funds, and it shall not be retained by the licensee under whose license the race meet was held.

Fifty percent of the breakage at any horse race meet shall be retained by the licensee under whose license the horse race meet was held and the remainder shall be paid as purses for the races conducted at the race meet.

The breakage at any greyhound race meet shall be retained by the licensee under whose license the greyhound race meet was held.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1)(h)(IV) or (4) of this section, the breakage on any simulcast race of horses or greyhounds received by an in-state simulcast facility shall be retained by the operator of the in-state simulcast facility.

In the case of simulcast races of horses received from an in-state host track, fifty percent of the breakage shall be paid to the licensee of the in-state host track within sixty days after the end of the race meet from which the simulcast race was broadcast and the remainder shall be paid as purses for the races conducted at the in-state host track.

An operator of an in-state simulcast facility shall retain the proceeds derived from all unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets for each simulcast race of greyhounds received for a race held at an out-of-state host track and, after a period of one year following the simulcast race, the proceeds revert and belong to the operator.

In the event the federal government or any federal governmental agency imposes a levy on the licensee by a tax on the money so wagered and upon and against its receipts, the licensee may collect, in addition to the percentage and breaks allowed in this section, the amount of the tax so levied.

The tax and breaks and license fee provided for in this article 32 shall be in lieu of all other license fees and privilege taxes or charges by the state of Colorado or any county, city, town, or other municipality or taxing body for the privilege of conducting any race meet provided for in this article 32 and licensed by the authority of this article 32; except that any county, city, town, or other municipality or taxing body that imposed any fee, tax, or charge prior to July 1, 1982, on the money so wagered, or upon and against the licensee's receipts, or for the privilege of conducting any race meet provided for and licensed by authority of this article 32 shall have the authority to amend, repeal and reenact, or repeal any such fee, tax, or charge and impose a new or different fee or tax on the money so wagered, or upon and against the licensee's receipts, or for the privilege of conducting any race meet provided for and licensed by authority of this article 32, and no provision of this article 32 shall affect the authority of the county, city, town, or other municipality or taxing body with respect to such fees or taxes unless the provision specifically refers to this subsection (2)(b). Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, it is lawful for the licensee to take such fee or tax from the gross receipts on pari-mutuel wagering; and in such cases the licensee shall pay the fee or tax directly to the county, city, town, or other municipality or taxing body.

Unless expressly authorized by this article 32, no person may act for consideration as an agent or courier for another person for the purpose of placing wagers or cashing or redeeming winning pari-mutuel tickets. In addition to the remedies otherwise provided for violations of this article 32, the commission may petition any court of competent jurisdiction for an order enjoining a violation of this subsection (3).

Pursuant to a valid simulcasting agreement, an operator of an in-state simulcast facility that receives simulcast signals of horse or greyhound races held in another state may:

Take the percentage of the gross receipts of any pari-mutuel wagering on the simulcast races as is allowable under the laws and rules of the other state; and

Adopt the procedures for computation and distribution of breakage as are allowable under the laws and rules of the other state.

Source:

L. 2018:

(1)(f)(II) added, (SB 18-182), ch. 115, p. 812, § 2, effective April 12; entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 314, § 2, effective October 1.

44-32-703. Pari-mutuel pools for race meets and simulcast races.

The pari-mutuel pool for a horse race meet and for simulcast races of the race meet shall be an intrastate common pool; except that, if the simulcast races are received by an out-of-state simulcast facility, the pari-mutuel pool may be an interstate common pool, and, in that case, it shall be operated by the in-state host track conducting the horse race meet.

An in-state simulcast facility receiving simulcast races from an out-of-state host track may participate either in a pari-mutuel pool into which only the pari-mutuel wagers on the simulcast races that are placed at the in-state simulcast facility are taken or in an interstate common pool. The commission shall permit an operator of an in-state simulcast facility participating in an interstate common pool to adopt the takeout percentage of the out-of-state host track for the interstate common pool.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 317, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-703 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-32-704. Limitations on pari-mutuel wagering.

Wagers on pari-mutuel horse or greyhound races conducted in or out of this state may only be placed upon the premises of a racetrack or an in-state simulcast facility licensed by the commission or the out-of-state racetrack or simulcast facility as authorized by the commission. No wagering or betting on the results of any of the races licensed under this article 32 shall be conducted outside a licensed or approved racetrack or simulcast facility.

No person or agent or employee of any person shall place, receive, offer, or agree to place or receive a wager on a pari-mutuel horse or greyhound race, conducted in or broadcast in this state, by messenger, telephone, telegraph, facsimile machine, or other electronic device; except that this subsection (2) shall not apply to associations or simulcast facilities licensed by the commission. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit gambling as provided in section 18-10-102 (2)(d).

Any person who violates subsection (2)(a) of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 317, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-703.5 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-32-705. Horse breeders' and owners' awards and supplemental purse fund - awards - advisory committee - rules.

There is hereby created a fund, to be known as the horse breeders' and owners' awards and supplemental purse fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", that shall consist of money deposited thereto by the licensee for the racing of horses and by an operator of an in-state simulcast facility that receives simulcast races of horses for the purposes of this section, to be held in a trust account, which money shall be paid out to owners and breeders of Colorado-bred horses as provided in this section and by rules of the commission. The rules shall provide for an administrative fee to be paid to the Colorado horse breeder associations for registering and maintaining breeding records for the administration of the fund. The fees shall not exceed ten percent of the total money generated by the unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets and the money provided by section 44-32-701 (2)(b).

The money derived pursuant to section 44-32-701 (2)(b) shall be paid to a trust account for the fund on the fifteenth day of the calendar month immediately following the month in which the sum was received. In addition, the proceeds derived from all unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets for each horse race meet and for each simulcast race of horses received by an in-state simulcast facility shall be paid to a trust account for the fund after a period of one year following the end of the race meet.

After money from the fund has been distributed to the respective breeder associations, further distribution shall be governed by the bylaws of the associations. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the distribution of money from the fund to owners and breeders of Colorado-bred horses that are otherwise eligible under the bylaws of the associations and that run in races outside Colorado.

Notwithstanding section 24-30-204, the commission may establish by rule a period for distribution of money in the fund that is not consistent with the state's general fiscal-year period.

Any money credited to the fund and not distributed within three years shall be paid, as authorized by the commission, either:

As purses for races held at live race meets in Colorado; or

As fees required for participation in an interstate compact to which Colorado is a party pursuant to section 44-32-202 (4).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 318, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-704 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-32-706. Payments to state - disposition.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1)(b) of this section and in sections 44-32-701, 44-32-702 (1), and 44-32-705, all sums referred to in sections 44-32-701, 44-32-702 (1), and 44-32-705, including all sums collected for license fees and fines pursuant to the provisions of this article 32, shall be paid to the department through the division on the tenth business day of the month immediately following the month in which each performance took place, and the licensee shall make a return as required by rules of the commission.

In temporary or emergency situations, a licensed operator for the racing of animals, with the approval of and under the direction of the director or the director's designee, may provide for veterinary services as described in section 44-32-202 (3), at the licensed operator's expense, and the expense thus incurred may be deducted from the payment made to the department in accordance with subsection (1)(a) of this section; except that the amount deducted shall not exceed the amount set by the commission for those veterinary services.

All money collected by the department through the division shall, on the next business day following the receipt thereof, be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the general fund of the state; except that license fees established and collected by the director pursuant to section 44-32-202 (3)(h) shall be credited to the racing cash fund created in section 44-32-205. The department shall have all the powers, rights, and duties provided in article 21 of title 39 to carry out the collection.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate from the racing cash fund created in section 44-32-205 the direct and indirect costs of administering this article 32.

Any person who fails to make a return or pay any tax required under this article 32 shall be liable for penalties and interest as follows:

A penalty of the greater of fifteen dollars for each failure to make a return and for each failure to pay a tax when due, or ten percent thereof plus one-half percent per month from the date when due, not exceeding eighteen percent, in the aggregate; and

Interest on any tax due, from the date due, at the rate specified in section 39-21-110.5.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 318, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-705 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-32-707. Agreement of this state.

In the event any county or municipality development revenue bonds are issued in reliance on the provisions of this article 32, the state of Colorado does hereby covenant and agree with the holders of any such bonds that the state will not limit or alter the rights or powers of the owners of the bonds or to repeal, amend, or otherwise directly or indirectly modify this article 32 or the effect thereof as to the assessments, fees, charges, pledged revenues, or any combination thereof in such a manner as to impair adversely any such outstanding bonds, until all such bonds have been paid and discharged in full or provision for their payment and redemption has been fully made. The covenant and agreement may be included in any agreement with the holders of the bonds.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 319, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-60-706 as it existed prior to 2018.